Nevada, session 83, SB187.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 432B of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 and 3 of this act.
Sec. 2. 1. If an agency which provides child welfare
services is required to provide consent before a child who is in the
custody of the agency may receive non-emergency medical care
that is recommended by a provider of health care, the agency
which provides child welfare services shall provide or deny such
consent not later than 14 days after the caseworker assigned to the
child receives written notice of the recommendation or referral for
such care.
2. If any person or entity, including, without limitation, a
person legally responsible for the psychiatric care of a child
appointed pursuant to NRS 432B.4685, is required to provide
consent before a child who is in the custody of an agency which
provides child welfare services may receive medical or mental
health treatment, the agency which provides child welfare services
shall:
(a) Make reasonable efforts to obtain such consent not later
than 14 days after the caseworker assigned to the child receives
written notice of the need for the treatment, which may be
demonstrated by, without limitation, a referral for the treatment;
and
(b) Notify the person or entity with whom the child is placed as
soon as practicable and without delay after obtaining such consent
or the denial of such consent.
3. If an order of the court is required before a child who is in
the custody of an agency which provides child welfare services
may receive non-emergency medical care that is recommended by
a provider of health care, the agency which provides child welfare
services shall:
(a) Make reasonable efforts to initiate such an order not later
than 14 days after the caseworker assigned to the child receives
written notice of the recommendation or referral for such care;
and
(b) Notify the person or entity with whom the child is placed as
soon as practicable and without delay after obtaining such an
order or the denial of a request for such an order.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
4. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a
party with proper standing from seeking a court order for the
medical treatment of a child in the custody of a child welfare
agency.
5. As used in this section, “provider of health care” has the
meaning ascribed to it in NRS 629.031.
Secs. 3-18. (Deleted by amendment.)
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)